Rhode Island statutes. Title 21 Food and Drugs
Chapter 1 Frozen Food Products

21-1-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be entitled and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Frozen Food Products Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-2.
Definitions.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the words and phrases defined in this section are used in this chapter in the sense given them in the following definitions:

“Director” means the director of health.

“Frozen food” means and includes any article used for food or drink for man or other animals which has been: (i) processed, (ii) preserved, and/or (iii) packaged, and (iv) is destined for sale in a frozen state.

Where the term “and/or” is used, either word shall apply as the context requires.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-3.
Transportation and storage.

No person engaged in the business of transporting, storing, or selling frozen food shall transport, store, and/or expose for sale that food within the state unless it is transported, stored, and/or exposed for sale under refrigeration which shall ensure good keeping qualities under temperatures and holding conditions approved by the director.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-4.
Rules and regulations.

The director shall, after a public hearing following due notice to interested parties, promulgate rules and regulations consistent with the provisions of this chapter for the storing and transportation of frozen food, including temperature control, sanitation, and other matters, in accordance with recognized standards necessary for the protection of public health and the preservation of frozen food in wholesome condition.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-5.
Enforcement.

The director is authorized and directed to administer and supervise the enforcement of this chapter; to provide for any inspections and investigations, that may be necessary to:

Disclose violations;

Receive and provide for the investigation of complaints; and

Provide for the institution and prosecution of civil or criminal actions or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-6.
Complaints for violations.

Complaints for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter may be made by the director or by any duly authorized agent of the director, or by any other person, and if made by the director or an agent, surety for costs on any complaint shall not be required, nor costs collected in case of failure to sustain the complaint.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-7.
Notice and hearing on violations.

Before any criminal proceeding is commenced for a violation of this chapter, the person against whom the proceeding is contemplated shall be given appropriate notice and an opportunity to present his or her views before the director or his or her designated agent, either orally or in writing, in person, or by attorney, with regard to the contemplated proceedings.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-8.
Notice of minor violations — Warnings.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as requiring the director to report for the institution of proceedings under this chapter, minor violations of this chapter, whenever the director believes that the public interest will be adequately served in the circumstances by a suitable written notice or warning.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-9.
Injunctions authorized.

In addition to the remedies provided in §

21-1-10

the director is authorized to apply to the superior court for, and that court shall have jurisdiction upon hearing and for cause shown to grant, a temporary or permanent injunction restraining any person from violating any provision of this chapter, irrespective of whether or not there exists an adequate remedy at law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-10.
Violations of chapter — Penalty.

Any person that violates any of the provisions of this chapter, or of the rules and regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter, and any principal, proprietor, agent, servant, or employee, who directs or knowingly permits the violation or who aids or assists in the violation, shall upon conviction, be subject to a fine of not more than one hundred dollars ($100); but if a violation is committed after a conviction of the person under this section has become final, the person shall be subject to a fine of not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each succeeding offense. Each violation shall be considered a separate offense.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-11.
Applicability to retail sales.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to apply to the delivery of frozen food by a retailer to the purchaser.

History of Section.

P.L. 1963, ch. 164, § 1.

21-1-12 — 21-1-15.
Repealed.